Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 10. Fisheries Enhancement Loan Program.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose related to AS

16.10.375

—

16.10.560

, see
§ 1, ch. 59, SLA 1979, in the 1979 Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves.

Administrative Code. —

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

Sec. 16.10.500.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state, under AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

, to promote the enhancement of the state’s fisheries by means of grants for organizational and planning purposes to regional associations described in AS

16.10.510

that have qualified under AS

16.10.380

, and by means of long-term, low interest loans for hatchery planning, construction, and operation and for planning and implementation of enhancement and rehabilitation activities including, but not limited to, lake fertilization and habitat improvement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Sec. 16.10.505.
Fisheries enhancement revolving loan fund.

There is created within the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development a revolving fund to be known as the fisheries enhancement revolving loan fund. Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, the fund shall be used to carry out the purposes of AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

and for no other purpose. All principal and interest payments, and money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

, shall be paid into the fisheries enhancement revolving loan fund.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

.

Money in the fund that the commissioner determines to be excess to that needed to carry out the purpose of AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

may be used to carry out the purpose of AS

16.10.300

—

16.10.370

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 1985; am §§ 25, 26 ch 36 SLA 1990; am §§ 6, 7 ch 62 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 16.10.507.
Foreclosure expense account.

There is established as a special account within the fisheries enhancement revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

16.10.520

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 12 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Sec. 16.10.510.
Powers and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner may

make loans to permit holders, under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, including those holders issued permits before June 24, 1977, for the planning, construction, and operation of hatchery facilities;

make loans to qualified regional associations that have formed a nonprofit corporation or a local nonprofit corporation approved by a qualified regional association, for preconstruction activities necessary to obtain a permit;

designate agents and delegate powers to them as necessary;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided;

establish amortization plans for repayment of loans, not to exceed 30 years unless the commissioner has extended the term of the loan beyond 30 years under (11) of this section;

establish the rate of interest for loans not to exceed nine and one-half percent a year;

establish regional and local offices and advisory groups to carry out, or assist in carrying out, the duties and authority of the commissioner;

make grants for organizational and planning purposes to qualified regional associations that have formed a nonprofit corporation, in amounts not exceeding $100,000 per region and up to an additional $100,000 on a 50/50 cash matching basis with the regional associations that have an authorized royalty assessment under AS

16.10.540

; the state portion of the matching share shall be available when a final vote for assessments is made under AS

16.10.540

; this provision also applies to qualified regional associations that have formed a nonprofit corporation before June 24, 1977;

make loans to qualified regional associations that have formed a nonprofit corporation or to local nonprofit corporations approved by qualified regional associations for planning and implementation of fisheries enhancement and rehabilitation activities including, but not limited to, lake fertilization and habitat improvement;

refinance a debt obligation incurred by a borrower under this section if the borrower otherwise qualifies for a loan under AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

; the interest rate for a loan to refinance a debt obligation incurred under this section may not exceed the interest rate that is in effect for new loans under this section at the time that the loan commitment for the refinancing loan is made; a loan made under this paragraph is not subject to AS

16.10.525

;

extend the term of a loan made under this section if the commissioner finds that extension of the term of the loan would alleviate an undue financial hardship on the borrower; the commissioner shall submit annually a report to the legislature summarizing the commissioner’s decisions during the prior calendar year to approve or deny requests to extend loans under this paragraph and the reasons for the decisions;

charge and collect the fees established under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1976; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1979; am § 11 ch 72 SLA 1979; am §§ 3, 4, 77 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 27, 28 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

Sec. 16.10.520.
Limitation on loans.

A single fisheries enhancement loan may not exceed $10,000,000 for a hatchery or other enhancement or rehabilitation activity conducted under a permit granted to a qualified regional association that has formed a nonprofit corporation, or to a local nonprofit corporation approved by a qualified regional association. A loan for any other nonprofit hatchery corporation project may not exceed $1,000,000.

Loans for the total project costs may be made if the commissioner determines that the applicant has sufficient financial resources to insure the establishment of an equity position in the project equal to 10 percent of the loan within 10 years or less, either through a royalty assessment levied under AS

16.10.540

or other means approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this subsection, “total project costs” includes planning and construction costs for the facility and the cost of operations for not more than the first 10 years. The costs for operations shall be loaned on an annual basis.

All loans shall be secured by collateral satisfactory to the commissioner, including but not limited to a first deed of trust, assignment of lease and leasehold improvements, sale of surplus fish from the hatchery, or royalty assessments from fishermen levied under AS

16.10.540

.

The commissioner may require adequate evidence of performance in utilizing loan funds approved for an initial or preliminary project before approving a subsequent loan application.

The total amount of loans made or purchased in any fiscal year may not exceed the amount specifically authorized by statute.

The commissioner may not make a loan under AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.550

from funds available under AS

16.10.340(c)

, unless the commissioner determines, in consultation with the appropriate regional planning team established under AS

16.10.375

, that the hatchery or other enhancement or rehabilitation activity for which the loan is requested will provide a significant contribution to common property fisheries, be operated in a manner beneficial to the public interest, and be managed in a financially viable manner that is reasonably expected to result in repayment of the loan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1976; am §§ 12, 13 ch 154 SLA 1977; am §§ 6, 7 ch 59 SLA 1979; am §§ 5, 6 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 62 SLA 1994; am § 27 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

Sec. 16.10.525.
Repayment of principal and interest on loans.

The commissioner may not require the repayment of principal on a loan made under AS

16.10.510

for the initial period of the loan.
Interest on the principal of a loan made under AS

16.10.510

does not accrue during the initial period of the loan. In this subsection, the “initial period of the loan” means a period of time determined by the commissioner that is not less than six years or more than 10 years from the date the loan is made.

History.

(§ 7 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For fisheries enhancement loans and grants, see 3 AAC 81.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79, ch. 106, SLA 1980, makes this section retroactive to, and applicable to loans made under AS

16.10.510

after, June 18, 1976.

Sec. 16.10.530.
Royalty assessment on sale of salmon. [Repealed, § 67 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 16.10.540.
Voluntary assessment on sale of salmon.

An association of persons who hold entry permits under AS 16.43, that consists of at least 51 percent of the persons holding entry permits and actively participating in a fishery to be benefited by a hatchery program, may levy and collect an assessment from among its members for the purpose of securing and repaying a loan made under AS

16.10.510

.

Upon satisfactory demonstration to the commissioner that an assessment levied under this section may reasonably be relied upon to secure and repay a loan to be made under AS

16.10.510

, the commissioner may make the loan.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1979; am § 33 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Sec. 16.10.550.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes. [Repealed, § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 16.10.555.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

. Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 13 ch 79 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 152 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 16.10.560.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.500

—

16.10.560

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“hatchery” means a facility for the artificial incubation of salmon eggs, which may include means for the rearing of juvenile salmon.

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.